Utah statutes.
41-1a-414.   Parking privileges for persons with disabilities.

(1)  As used in this section, "accessible parking space" means a parking space that is clearly identified as reserved for use by a person with a disability and includes:

(a)  vertical signage, including the international symbol of accessibility, that is visible from a passing vehicle; and

(b)  a clearly marked access aisle, if provided, that is adjacent to and considered part of the parking space.

(2)  Except in parking areas designated for emergency use, a person with a disability, qualifying under rules made in accordance with Section 41-1a-420, may park an appropriately marked vehicle for reasonable periods without charge in metered parking zones and restricted parking areas, in a manner that allows proper access to the vehicle by the person with a disability.

(3)  Only those vehicles carrying a person with a disability special group license plate, temporary removable windshield placard, or removable windshield placard and transporting a qualifying person with a disability may park in an accessible parking space.

(4)  This section applies to and may be enforced on public property and on private property that is used or intended for use by the public.

(5)  The parking privileges granted by this section also apply to vehicles displaying a person with a disability special group license plate, temporary removable windshield placard, or removable windshield placard issued by another jurisdiction if displayed on a vehicle being used by a person with a disability.

